Hawaii, session 2026, SB2131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Act 128, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is amended by amending section 3 to read as follows: "SECTION 3.  Once the Hawaii tourism authority prepares and submits an updated tourism functional plan pursuant to this Act and section 226‑56, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the governor shall transmit the approved tourism functional plan to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the subsequent regular session [of 2025.]; provided that the preparation of the updated tourism functional plan shall be subject to the availability of funding." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________